District of Columbia statutes.
4-1407

Refusal to issue, revocation or suspension of licenses; reinstatement or reissuance.

The Mayor may refuse to reissue or may revoke or suspend the license of any child-placing agency after full hearing on proof of violation of any provisions of this subchapter or the rules and regulations promulgated hereunder. Before any license shall be suspended or revoked the holder thereof shall have notice in writing of the charge or charges and shall, at the date and place specified in said notice, which shall be at least 5 days after the service thereof, be given a hearing by said Mayor, or his designated agents, with a full opportunity to produce testimony in his, her, or its behalf. Any licensee whose license has been suspended or revoked may, after the expiration of 90 days, on application to the said Mayor, have the same reinstated or reissued upon satisfactory proof that the disqualification has ceased.

Apr. 22, 1944, 58 Stat. 195, ch. 174, § 7
Apr. 23, 1980, D.C. Law 3-59, § 2(a), 27 DCR 983
Administrative procedure, judicial review, see § 2-510.
Administrative procedure, supplemental procedures, suppression of conflicting laws, see § 2-501.
1981 Ed., § 32-1008.
1973 Ed., § 32-787.